Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-705
State Fire Day; Fire Recognition Day; designation; how observed.

For the purpose of creating public sentiment and calling public attention to the great damage caused both to life and property by fire, the Friday before Fire Recognition Day shall be designated and known as State Fire Day. State Fire Day shall be observed by the public, private, and parochial schools of the state with exercises appropriate to the subject and the day. The second Saturday in May is designated and shall be known as Fire Recognition Day.

Laws 1911, c. 126, § 1, p. 431;

R.S.1913, § 6850;

C.S.1922, § 6421;

C.S.1929, § 79-1201;

R.S.1943, § 79-1201;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 160, p. 746;

Laws 1971, LB 917, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,122;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 379;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 18.